Florida, session 2026, HB965.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
54
55 Section 1. Section 44.104, Florida Statutes, is amended to
56 read:
57 44.104 Voluntary binding arbitration and voluntary trial
58 resolution.—
59 (1) Two or more opposing parties who are involved in a
60 civil dispute may agree in writing to submit the controversy to
61 voluntary binding arbitration, or voluntary trial resolution, in
62 lieu of litigation of the issues involved before, prior to or
63 after a lawsuit has been filed, provided no constitutional issue
64 is involved.
65 (2) If the parties have entered into an agreement that
66 which provides in voluntary binding arbitration for a method for
67 appointing of one or more arbitrators, or which provides in
68 voluntary trial resolution a method for appointing a member of
69 The Florida Bar in good standing for more than 5 years to act as
70 trial resolution judge, the court shall proceed with the
71 appointment as prescribed. However, in voluntary binding
72 arbitration at least one of the arbitrators, who shall serve as
73 the chief arbitrator, shall meet the qualifications and training
74 requirements adopted pursuant to s. 44.106. In the absence of an
75 agreement, or if the agreement method fails or for any reason
Page 3 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb965-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 965 2026
76 cannot be followed, the court, on application of a party, shall
77 appoint one or more qualified arbitrators, or the trial
78 resolution judge, as the case requires.
79 (3) The arbitrators must or trial resolution judge shall
80 be compensated by the parties according to their agreement.
81 (4) Within 10 days after the submission of the request for
82 binding arbitration, or voluntary trial resolution, the court
83 shall provide for the appointment of the arbitrator or
84 arbitrators, or trial resolution judge, as the case requires.
85 Once appointed, the arbitrators or trial resolution judge shall
86 notify the parties of the time and place for the hearing.
87 (5) Application for voluntary binding arbitration must or
88 voluntary trial resolution shall be filed and fees paid to the
89 clerk of court as if for complaints initiating civil actions.
90 The clerk of the court shall handle and account for these
91 matters in all respects as if they were civil actions, except
92 that the clerk of court shall keep separate the records of the
93 applications for voluntary binding arbitration and the records
94 of the applications for voluntary trial resolution from all
95 other civil actions.
96 (6) Filing of the application for binding arbitration
97 tolls or voluntary trial resolution will toll the running of the
98 applicable statutes of limitation.
99 (7) The chief arbitrator or trial resolution judge may
100 administer oaths or affirmations and conduct the proceedings as
Page 4 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb965-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 965 2026
101 the rules of court shall provide. At the request of any party,
102 the chief arbitrator or trial resolution judge shall issue
103 subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and for the production
104 of books, records, documents, and other evidence and may apply
105 to the court for orders compelling attendance and production.
106 Subpoenas shall be served and shall be enforceable in the manner
107 provided by law.
108 (8) A voluntary binding arbitration hearing shall be
109 conducted by all of the arbitrators, but a majority may
110 determine any question and render a final decision. A trial
111 resolution judge shall conduct a voluntary trial resolution
112 hearing. The trial resolution judge may determine any question
113 and render a final decision.
114 (9) The Florida Evidence Code applies shall apply to all
115 proceedings under this section.
116 (10) An appeal of a voluntary binding arbitration decision
117 shall be taken to the circuit court and shall be limited to
118 review on the record and not de novo, of:
119 (a) Any alleged failure of the arbitrators to comply with
120 the applicable rules of procedure or evidence.
121 (b) Any alleged partiality or misconduct by an arbitrator
122 prejudicing the rights of any party.
123 (c) Whether the decision reaches a result contrary to the
124 Constitution of the United States or the State Constitution.
125 (11) Any party may enforce a final decision rendered in a
Page 5 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb965-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 965 2026
126 voluntary trial by filing a petition for final judgment in the
127 circuit court in the circuit in which the voluntary trial took
128 place. Upon entry of final judgment by the circuit court, any
129 party may appeal to the appropriate appellate court. Factual
130 findings determined in the voluntary trial are not subject to
131 appeal.
132 (11)(12) The harmless error doctrine applies shall apply
133 in all appeals. No Further review is not shall be permitted
134 unless a constitutional issue is raised.
135 (12)(13) If no appeal is taken within the time provided by
136 rules promulgated by the Supreme Court, then the decision shall
137 be referred to the presiding judge in the case, or if one has
138 not been assigned, then to the chief judge of the circuit for
139 assignment to a circuit judge, who shall enter such orders and
140 judgments as are required to carry out the terms of the
141 decision, which orders shall be enforceable by the contempt
142 powers of the court and for which judgments execution shall
143 issue on request of a party.
144 (13)(14) This section does shall not apply to any dispute
145 involving child custody, visitation, or child support, or to any
146 dispute that which involves the rights of a third party not a
147 party to the arbitration or voluntary trial resolution when the
148 third party would be an indispensable party if the dispute were
149 resolved in court or when the third party notifies the chief
150 arbitrator or the trial resolution judge that the third party
Page 6 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb965-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 965 2026
151 would be a proper party if the dispute were resolved in court,
152 that the third party intends to intervene in the action in
153 court, and that the third party does not agree to proceed under
154 this section.
155 Section 2. Section 44.1045, Florida Statutes, is created
156 to read:
157 44.1045 Voluntary trial resolution.—
158 (1) As used in this section, the term "presiding judge"
159 means the judge assigned to the case.
160 (2)(a) The parties to a civil case, a family law case, or
161 a probate case may by written agreement or stipulation agree to
162 the appointment of an individual to serve as a voluntary trial
163 resolution judge to adjudicate all of the remaining issues in
164 the case, subject to the exceptions set forth in subsection
165 (12).
166 (b) To be eligible to be appointed to serve as a voluntary
167 trial resolution judge, the individual selected by the parties
168 must be a member of The Florida Bar in good standing for more
169 than 5 years.
170 (c) Any time after an action is filed, the parties may
171 file a written agreement or stipulation to appoint a voluntary
172 trial resolution judge with the clerk of the court in which the
173 action is pending and a joint motion requesting appointment of a
174 voluntary trial resolution judge, selecting the individual whom
175 the parties wish to have appointed. The joint motion shall be
Page 7 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb965-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 965 2026
176 accompanied by a form signed by the selected voluntary trial
177 resolution judge consenting to the appointment. The parties
178 shall promptly serve a copy of the joint motion and form on the
179 presiding judge.
180 (d) Within 10 days after the submission of the request for
181 appointment of a voluntary trial resolution judge, the presiding
182 judge shall enter an order appointing the voluntary trial
183 resolution judge selected by the parties. The order designating
184 the voluntary trial resolution judge shall be signed by the
185 presiding judge, refer to the parties' written agreement or
186 stipulation, and provide that the voluntary trial resolution
187 judge shall be compensated by the parties in accordance with the
188 terms of the parties' agreement or stipulation.
189 (e) A voluntary trial resolution judge appointed under
190 this subsection must take and subscribe to an oath of office,
191 swearing or affirming that he or she has read and will conform
192 with Canons 1, 2A, and 3, and any other provisions of the
193 Florida Code of Judicial Conduct which might reasonably be
194 applicable depending on the nature of the judicial function
195 performed, except as modified by this section.
196 (f) Upon appointment by the presiding judge, a voluntary
197 trial resolution judge shall adjudicate the case until the case
198 is finally determined by adjudication, including posttrial
199 motions and requests for attorney fees, dismissal, or other
200 final disposition, unless disqualification or recusal is
Page 8 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb965-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 965 2026
201 required pursuant to subsection (3).
202 (g) If a voluntary trial resolution judge appointed under
203 this subsection cannot serve in that capacity for any reason,
204 absent further agreement or stipulation by the parties to
205 appoint another individual to serve as voluntary trial
206 resolution judge, the case shall be returned to the presiding
207 judge.
208 (3) Where circumstances exist that require
209 disqualification of a judge under Canon 3E of the Florida Code
210 of Judicial Conduct, a voluntary trial resolution judge shall
211 immediately disclose to the parties on the record the grounds
212 for disqualification. The parties may waive the disqualification
213 by filing a written waiver with the clerk of the court within 10
214 days after such disclosure. This subsection does not limit the
215 authority of a voluntary trial resolution judge to enter an
216 order of recusal. Sections 38.02 and 38.10 and Florida Rules of
217 General Practice and Judicial Administration 2.330 apply to any
218 motion to disqualify a voluntary trial resolution judge. In the
219 event of recusal, or if a motion to disqualify a voluntary trial
220 resolution judge is granted, the case shall be returned to the
221 presiding judge.
222 (4) A voluntary trial resolution judge shall be
223 compensated by the parties in such amount, and subject to such
224 terms and conditions, as provided by the parties in a written
225 agreement or stipulation. A contract for the services of a
Page 9 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb965-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 965 2026
226 voluntary trial resolution judge must provide for payment of
227 compensation by the parties to the voluntary trial resolution
228 judge. The presiding judge may enforce the terms of a written
229 agreement or stipulation against the parties and shall retain
230 jurisdiction to enforce such agreement or stipulation after
231 entry of any judgment therefrom.
232 (5) The clerk of the court shall treat cases referred to
233 voluntary trial resolution the same as any other comparable
234 action, except that the clerk of court shall keep separate the
235 records of the applications for voluntary trial resolution from
236 all other comparable actions. The chief judge, or his or her
237 designee, shall, upon request of the parties, make available
238 public facilities and personnel in proceedings assigned to a
239 voluntary trial resolution judge to the same extent as for other
240 comparable matters not assigned to a voluntary trial resolution
241 judge. For jury matters, the chief judge and the clerk of the
242 court shall coordinate the provision of jurors with the
243 voluntary trial resolution judge. For all other matters, the
244 parties may agree to use facilities other than facilities for
245 circuit and county courts. The parties are responsible for any
246 compensation to personnel and any costs in relation to the case,
247 including, but not limited to, the costs associated with the use
248 of such facilities and any materials that are not provided by
249 the court.
250 (6) A voluntary trial resolution judge shall perform all
Page 10 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb965-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 965 2026
251 judicial functions from the time of appointment by the presiding
252 judge until the case is finally determined by adjudication,
253 including posttrial motions and requests for attorney fees,
254 dismissal, or other final disposition, except for the
255 disposition of a request that a party be held in contempt and
256 the entry of an order with respect to any nonparty to the case.
257 The presiding judge shall maintain jurisdiction to exercise
258 contempt power and to enforce a subpoena issued to any nonparty
259 to the case. The presiding judge shall enter the final judgment
260 prepared by the voluntary trial resolution judge. The presiding
261 judge shall have exclusive jurisdiction over enforcement of any
262 judgment and any supplementary proceedings filed in the same
263 action.
264 (7) A voluntary trial resolution judge shall conduct
265 proceedings under this section pursuant to the Florida Rules of
266 Civil Procedure, the Family Law Rules of Procedure, or the
267 Probate Rules, as applicable.
268 (8) The Florida Evidence Code applies to all proceedings
269 under this section.
270 (9) Voluntary trial resolution proceedings shall be
271 noticed and open to the public to the same extent as if such
272 proceedings were before the presiding judge.
273 (10) Upon entry of final judgment by the presiding judge,
274 a party may appeal to the appropriate appellate court in the
275 same manner and to the same extent as any other proceeding
Page 11 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb965-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 965 2026
276 before the court. The harmless error doctrine applies in any
277 such review. A party may not seek to have an order or ruling of
278 a voluntary trial resolution judge reviewed, modified, or
279 overturned by the presiding judge during the voluntary trial
280 resolution judge's appointment.
281 (11) Except as provided in subsection (12), voluntary
282 trial resolution is available in all civil, family, and probate
283 cases.
284 (12) This section does not apply to any dispute involving
285 the constitutionality of a statute, child custody, visitation,
286 or child support, or to any dispute involving the rights of a
287 third party who is not a party to the voluntary trial resolution
288 proceedings when the third party would be an indispensable party
289 if the dispute were resolved in court or when the third party
290 notifies the voluntary trial resolution judge that the third
291 party would be a proper party if the dispute were resolved in
292 court, that the third party intends to intervene in the action,
293 and that the third party does not agree to proceed under this
294 section.
295 Section 3. Subsection (1) of section 44.107, Florida
296 Statutes, is amended to read:
297 44.107 Immunity for arbitrators, voluntary trial
298 resolution judges, mediators, and mediator trainees.—
299 (1) Arbitrators serving under s. 44.103 or s. 44.104,
300 voluntary trial resolution judges serving under s. 44.1045,
Page 12 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb965-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 965 2026
301 mediators serving under s. 44.102, and trainees fulfilling the
302 mentorship requirements for certification by the Supreme Court
303 as a mediator shall have judicial immunity in the same manner
304 and to the same extent as a judge.
305 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 13 of 13
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb965-01-c1